Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.133.030

Solicitation of gifts, grants, or endowments—Use. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

The office may solicit and receive gifts, grants, or endowments from private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the educational assistance grant program. The director, or the director's designee, may spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income from the private sources according to their terms unless the receipt of the gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17A.560.

[ 2012 c 198 s 24; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 236; 2011 c 60 s 12; 2003 c 19 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 198: See note following RCW 70A.15.5110.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See RCW 42.17A.919.

PDFRCW 28B.133.030

Solicitation of gifts, grants, or endowments—Use. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

The office may solicit and receive gifts, grants, or endowments from private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the educational assistance grant program. The director, or the director's designee, may spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income from the private sources according to their terms unless the receipt of the gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW 29B.45.020.

[ 2024 c 164 s 506; 2012 c 198 s 24; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 236; 2011 c 60 s 12; 2003 c 19 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2012 c 198: See note following RCW 70A.15.5110.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See note following RCW 29B.20.030.